Hawaii statutes.
[§658D-8] Arbitral tribunal or panel;
powers. The arbitral tribunal or panel established pursuant to section
658D-7 of this chapter, or a majority of them, may summon in writing any person
to attend before it or any of them as a witness and in a proper case to bring
certain described books, papers, records, and documents. The fees for
attendance shall be the same as the fees of witnesses before the circuit courts
of this State. The summons shall issue in the name of the arbitral tribunal or
panel and be signed by a majority of them, shall be directed to such person,
and shall be served in the same manner as subpoenas to testify before a court
of record. If any person so summoned to testify refuses or neglects to obey
the summons, upon petition the circuit court may compel the attendance of such
person before the arbitral tribunal or panel, or punish such person for
contempt in the same manner now provided for the attendance of witnesses or the
punishment of them in the circuit court. [L 1988, c 186, pt of §1]

Revision Note

In the first sentence, commas added after "chapter"
and "records" pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next